src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h22_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    ber+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: ber
    ber+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: ber
    ber+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: beri
    ber+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: bers
    ber+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: ber
    ber+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: ber
    ber+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: [berum, berjum]
    ber+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: berja
    ber+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: berið
    ber+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: berið
    ber+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: berinum
    ber+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: bersins
    ber+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: berini
    ber+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: berini
    ber+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: [berunum, berjunum]
    ber+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: berjanna
